Utah statutes.
19-1-305.   Administrative enforcement proceedings -- Tolling of limitation period.

Issuing a notice of a violation, an order, or a notice of agency action under this title tolls the running of the period of limitation for commencing a civil action to assess or collect a penalty until the sooner of:

(1)  the day on which the notice of violation, order, or agency action becomes final under Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act; or

(2)  three years from the day on which the department issues a notice or order described in this section.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

